California, session 20252026, AB2098.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 4600 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4600.(a)(1)Medical, surgical, chiropractic, acupuncture, licensed clinical social worker, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medicines, medical and surgical supplies, crutches, and apparatuses, including orthotic and prosthetic devices and services, that is reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured worker from the effects of the worker’s injury shall be provided by the employer. In the case of the employer’s neglect or refusal reasonably to do so, the employer is liable for the reasonable expense incurred by or on behalf of the employee in providing treatment.(2)(A)When possible, an employee shall make a reasonable effort to schedule treatment outside of regular work hours. A reasonable effort shall not require a worker to consequentially delay treatment.(B)If the treatment occurs during working hours and if the timing of the treatment is foreseeable, the employee shall provide reasonable, advance notification to the employer. If the timing of the treatment is unforeseeable, the employee shall provide notice of the treatment as soon as practicable.(C)If an employee has requested leave during work hours for treatment pursuant to subparagraph (B), the employer shall allow the employee to take leave unless business necessity would require the treatment to occur at a different time or on a different day. “Business necessity” refers to the business necessity defense established by Barns v. Workers’ Comp. Appeals Bd. (1989) 216 Cal.App.3d 524.(D)Leave taken by an employee pursuant to this section shall run concurrently with leave taken pursuant to the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), if the employee would have been eligible for that leave at the time leave was taken, and the Moore-Brown-Roberti Family Rights Act, commonly referred to as the California Family Rights Act (Sections 12945.2 and 19702.3 of the Government Code), if the employee would have been eligible for that leave at the time leave was taken.(E)If an employer denies an employee’s request to attend scheduled treatment during regular work hours, except pursuant to subparagraph (C), the employer’s conduct constitutes a violation under the provisions of Section 132a.(b)As used in this division and notwithstanding any other law, medical treatment that is reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured worker from the effects of the worker’s injury means treatment that is based upon the guidelines adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5307.27.(c)Unless the employer or the employer’s insurer has established or contracted with a medical provider network as provided for in Section 4616, after 30 days from the date the injury is reported, the employee may be treated by a physician of the employee’s own choice or at a facility of the employee’s own choice within a reasonable geographic area. A chiropractor shall not be a treating physician after the employee has received the maximum number of chiropractic visits allowed by subdivision (c) of Section 4604.5.(d)(1)If an employee has notified the employee’s employer in writing prior to the date of injury that the employee has a personal physician, the employee shall have the right to be treated by that physician from the date of injury if the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a plan, policy, or fund as described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 4616.7.(2)For purposes of paragraph (1), a personal physician shall meet all of the following conditions:(A)Be the employee’s regular physician and surgeon, licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(B)Be the employee’s primary care physician and has previously directed the medical treatment of the employee, and who retains the employee’s medical records, including the employee’s medical history. “Personal physician” includes a medical group, if the medical group is a single corporation or partnership composed of licensed doctors of medicine or osteopathy, which operates an integrated multispecialty medical group providing comprehensive medical services predominantly for nonoccupational illnesses and injuries.(C)The physician agrees to be predesignated.(3)If the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and the employer is notified pursuant to paragraph (1), all medical treatment, utilization review of medical treatment, access to medical treatment, and other medical treatment issues shall be governed by Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Disputes regarding the provision of medical treatment shall be resolved pursuant to Article 5.55 (commencing with Section 1374.30) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(4)If the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a group health insurance policy as described in Section 4616.7, all medical treatment, utilization review of medical treatment, access to medical treatment, and other medical treatment issues shall be governed by the applicable provisions of the Insurance Code.(5)The insurer may require prior authorization of any nonemergency treatment or diagnostic service and may conduct reasonably necessary utilization review pursuant to Section 4610.(6)An employee is entitled to all medically appropriate referrals by the personal physician to other physicians or medical providers within the nonoccupational health care plan. An employee is entitled to treatment by physicians or other medical providers outside of the nonoccupational health care plan pursuant to standards established in Article 5 (commencing with Section 1367) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(e)(1)When at the request of the employer, the employer’s insurer, the administrative director, the appeals board, or a workers’ compensation administrative law judge, the employee submits to examination by a physician, the employee is entitled to receive, in addition to all other benefits herein provided, all reasonable expenses of transportation, meals, and lodging incident to reporting for the examination, together with one day of temporary disability indemnity for each day of wages lost in submitting to the examination.(2)Regardless of the date of injury, “reasonable expenses of transportation” includes mileage fees from the employee’s home to the place of the examination and back at the rate of twenty-one cents ($0.21) a mile or the mileage rate adopted by the Director of Human Resources pursuant to Section 19820 of the Government Code, whichever is higher, plus any bridge tolls. The mileage and tolls shall be paid to the employee at the time the employee is given notification of the time and place of the examination.(f)When at the request of the employer, the employer’s insurer, the administrative director, the appeals board, or a workers’ compensation administrative law judge, an employee submits to examination by a physician and the employee does not proficiently speak or understand the English language, the employee shall be entitled to the services of a qualified interpreter in accordance with conditions and a fee schedule prescribed by the administrative director. These services shall be provided by the employer. For purposes of this section, “qualified interpreter” means a language interpreter certified, or deemed certified, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11435.05) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Section 68566 of, the Government Code.(g)If the injured employee cannot effectively communicate with the employee’s treating physician because the employee cannot proficiently speak or understand the English language, the injured employee is entitled to the services of a qualified interpreter during medical treatment appointments. To be a qualified interpreter for purposes of medical treatment appointments, an interpreter is not required to meet the requirements of subdivision (f), but shall meet any requirements established by rule by the administrative director that are substantially similar to the requirements set forth in Section 1367.04 of the Health and Safety Code. The administrative director shall adopt a fee schedule for qualified interpreter fees in accordance with this section. Upon request of the injured employee, the employer or insurance carrier shall pay for interpreter services. An employer shall not be required to pay for the services of an interpreter who is not certified or is provisionally certified by the person conducting the medical treatment or examination unless either the employer consents in advance to the selection of the individual who provides the interpreting service or the injured worker requires interpreting service in a language other than the languages designated pursuant to Section 11435.40 of the Government Code.(h)Home health care services shall be provided as medical treatment only if reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured employee from the effects of the employee’s injury and prescribed by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and subject to Section 5307.1 or 5307.8. The employer is not liable for home health care services that are provided more than 14 days prior to the date of the employer’s receipt of the physician’s prescription.SECTION 1. Section 132a of the Labor Code is amended to read:132a. (a) It is the declared policy of this state that there should not be discrimination against workers who are injured in the course and scope of their employment.(1) Any employer who discharges, or threatens to discharge, or in any manner discriminates against any employee because he or she the employee has filed or made known his or her their intention to file a claim for compensation with his or her their employer or an application for adjudication, or because the employee has received a rating, award, or settlement, is guilty of a misdemeanor and the employee’s compensation shall be increased by one-half, but in no event more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), together with costs and expenses not in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Any such employee shall also be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer.(2) Any insurer that advises, directs, or threatens an insured under penalty of cancellation or a raise in premium or for any other reason, to discharge an employee because he or she the employee has filed or made known his or her their intention to file a claim for compensation with his or her their employer or an application for adjudication, or because the employee has received a rating, award, or settlement, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the increased compensation and costs provided in paragraph (1).(3) Any employer who discharges, or threatens to discharge, or in any manner discriminates against any employee because the employee testified or made known his or her their intentions to testify in another employee’s case before the appeals board, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the employee shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer.(4) Any insurer that advises, directs, or threatens an insured employer under penalty of cancellation or a raise in premium or for any other reason, to discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee because the employee testified or made known his or her their intention to testify in another employee’s case before the appeals board, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(5) Any employer who discharges, or threatens to discharge, or in any manner discriminates against any employee because the employee requested or took leave pursuant to Section 4600.03, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the employee shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer. Proceedings(b) Proceedings for increased compensation as provided in paragraph (1), (1) of subdivision (a), or for reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits, are to be instituted by filing an appropriate petition with the appeals board, but these proceedings may not be commenced more than one year from the discriminatory act or date of termination of the employee. The appeals board is vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction to try and determine finally all matters specified in this section subject only to judicial review, except that the appeals board shall have no jurisdiction to try and determine a misdemeanor charge. The appeals board may refer and any worker may complain of suspected violations of the criminal misdemeanor provisions of this section to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, or directly to the office of the public prosecutor.SEC. 2. Section 4600.03 is added to the Labor Code, to read:4600.03. (a) When possible, an employee shall make a reasonable effort to schedule treatment pursuant to Section 4600, outside of regular work hours. A reasonable effort shall not require a worker to consequentially delay treatment.(b) If treatment pursuant to Section 4600 occurs during working hours and if the timing of the treatment is foreseeable, the employee shall provide reasonable, advance notification to the employer. If the timing of the treatment is unforeseeable, the employee shall provide notice of the treatment as soon as practicable.(c) (1) If an employee has requested leave during work hours for treatment pursuant to subdivision (b), the employer shall not deny the request unless business necessity would require the treatment to occur at a different time or on a different day.(2) An employer who denies a request, and who knows or should know that business necessity does not require the treatment to occur at a different time or on a different day, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(d) Leave taken by an employee pursuant to this section shall run concurrently with leave taken pursuant to the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), if the employee would have been eligible for that leave at the time leave was taken, and the Moore-Brown-Roberti Family Rights Act, commonly referred to as the California Family Rights Act (Sections 12945.2 and 19702.3 of the Government Code), if the employee would have been eligible for that leave at the time leave was taken.(e) For purposes of this section, “business necessity” means an overriding legitimate business purpose such that denial of the request is necessary to the safe and efficient operation of the business, and for which there is no feasible alternative to denial of the request that would serve the business purpose.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.